Maryland, session 2026, HB0600.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article 19 – St. Mary’s County
– 1 –

Ch. 349 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
113–2.
E. (2) All moneys deposited shall be protected by a depository bond or by other
securities approved by the Metropolitan Commission. The Treasurer and any Deputy
Treasurer appointed by the Metropolitan Commission shall give bond to the State of
Maryland, the Metropolitan Commission, and the Commissioners of St. Mary’s County to
the amount of [twenty–five] TWO HUNDRED AND FIFTY thousand dollars [($25,000)]
($250,000) or a greater amount that the Commissioners of St. Mary’s County prescribe,
with a good and sufficient surety, to be approved by the Commissioners of St. Mary’s
County. The bond shall provide, in a form approved by the Maryland Insurance
Administration and the County Attorney, that if the individual giving the bond shall well
and faithfully execute that individual’s office and account to the Metropolitan Commission
for all moneys received on behalf of the Metropolitan Commission without fraud or delay,
the required bond obligation shall be null and void, but shall otherwise remain in full force
and effect. The bond, when approved, shall be recorded in the Office of the Clerk of the
Circuit Court for St. Mary’s County.
113–5.
A. (1) The Metropolitan Commission [shall] MAY cause studies, plans and
estimates to be made for new facilities in those portions of St. Mary’s County DESIGNATED
AS NOT PLANNED FOR SERVICE BY THE ST. MARY’S COUNTY COMPREHENSIVE
WATER AND SEWERAGE PLAN, in which the Metropolitan Commission determines that
the facilities are necessary and [may divide each sanitary district into water and sewerage
districts in such a way as shall], in its judgment, best serve the needs of the various
communities and shall promote convenience and economy of installation and operation.
113–21.
A. CRIMINAL PENALTIES.
(1) [Unless otherwise provided, any act or omission designated as a] A
PERSON WHO VIOLATES ANY OF THE PROVISIONS LISTED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS
SUBSECTION IS GUILTY OF A misdemeanor [in the chapter is punishable by] AND, ON
CONVICTION, IS SUBJECT TO a fine of not more than one [hundred] THOUSAND dollars
[($100.00) or confinement] ($1,000.00) OR IMPRISONMENT for not more than thirty (30)
days [in the county jail,] or both.
(2) A PERSON IS SUBJECT TO THE PENALTIES PROVIDED IN
PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION IF THE PERSON VIOLATES:
(A) SECTION 113–7 OF THIS CHAPTER (LEVY OF TAXES);
(B) SECTION 113–11 OF THIS CHAPTER (PERMITS AND
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 349
REGULATIONS OF USE);
(C) SECTION 113–17 OF THIS CHAPTER (PRIVATELY
CONSTRUCTED SYSTEMS);
(D) SECTION 113–19 OF THIS CHAPTER (ENTRY INTO
BUILDINGS); OR
(E) SECTION 113–20 OF THIS CHAPTER (OBSTRUCTIONS).
(3) Where [this] THE act or omission is of a continuing nature and persists
in violation of the provisions of this chapter or of any rule or regulation promulgated under
this chapter, a conviction for one (1) offense is not a bar to a conviction for a continuation
of the offense subsequent to the first or any succeeding conviction.
B. (1) The Metropolitan Commission may designate any violation of this
chapter as a civil infraction, which shall be enforced as provided in this subsection.
(2) A Metropolitan Commission employee with the duty of enforcing this
chapter may deliver a citation to a person believed to be committing a violation. A copy of
the citation shall be retained by the Metropolitan Commission employee and shall bear a
certification attesting to the truth of the matters set forth. The citation shall contain:
(A) The name and address of the person charged;
(B) The nature of the violation;
(C) The place and time of the violation;
(D) The amount of the fine assessed;
(E) The manner, location, and time in which the fine may be paid;
and
(F) The person’s right to elect to stand trial for the violation.
(3) (A) Except as provided in paragraph (4) of this subsection, [a preset
fine, not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100.00), may be imposed for each violation] ON
DELIVERY OF A CITATION, THE METROPOLITAN COMMISSION MAY IMPOSE A FINE
OF:
(I) FOR A FIRST VIOLATION, TWO HUNDRED AND FIFTY
DOLLARS ($250.00);
(II) FOR A SECOND VIOLATION, FIVE HUNDRED DOLLARS
– 3 –

Ch. 349 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
($500.00);
(III) FOR A THIRD VIOLATION, SEVEN HUNDRED AND FIFTY
DOLLARS ($750.00); AND
(IV) FOR A FOURTH OR SUBSEQUENT VIOLATION, ONE
THOUSAND DOLLARS ($1,000.00).
(B) EACH DAY THAT A VIOLATION CONTINUES IS A SEPARATE
CIVIL INFRACTION SUBJECT TO AN ADDITIONAL CITATION AND A FINE IN THE
AMOUNT OF TWO HUNDRED AND FIFTY DOLLARS ($250.00).
(C) The Metropolitan Commission may establish a schedule of fines
for each violation and may adopt procedures for collection of these fines.
(4) (A) A person may not remove water from a public system under the
jurisdiction of the Metropolitan Commission without the prior authorization of the
Metropolitan Commission.
(B) The Metropolitan Commission may impose a fine [not
exceeding]:
(I) FOR A FIRST VIOLATION, NOT MORE THAN one
thousand dollars ($1,000.00) [for each violation of this paragraph]; AND
(II) FOR A SECOND OR SUBSEQUENT VIOLATION, NOT
MORE THAN TWO THOUSAND DOLLARS ($2,000.00).
(C) The Metropolitan Commission may establish a schedule of fines
for each violation of this paragraph based on the amount of water removed and the number
of prior violations by a person.
(5) A person who receives a citation may elect to stand trial for the offense
by filing with the Metropolitan Commission a notice of intention to stand trial. The notice
shall be given at least five (5) days before the date of payment as set forth in the citation.
On receipt of the notice of intention to stand trial, the Metropolitan Commission shall
forward to the district court having venue a copy of the citation and the notice of intention
to stand trial. On receipt of the citation, the district court shall schedule the case for trial
and notify the defendant of the trial date. All fines, penalties, or forfeitures collected by the
district court for violation shall be remitted to the Metropolitan Commission.
C. (1) The Metropolitan Commission may utilize administrative enforcement
remedies or seek judicial enforcement remedies for a violation of any rules and regulations
the Metropolitan Commission may adopt under this chapter concerning public water and
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 349
sewer use, including lines, and mains, all appurtenances, connections, and discharges into
the public sewer systems. The Metropolitan Commission shall establish procedures for
implementing the enforcement remedies authorized under this subsection.
(2) The Metropolitan Commission may utilize administrative enforcement
remedies that may include:
(A) A notification of a violation;
(B) A consent order;
(C) A show cause hearing;
(D) A compliance order;
(E) A cease and desist order;
(F) An administrative fine not to exceed one thousand dollars
($1,000.00) per violation, per day;
(G) An assessment for the reimbursement of actual costs incurred by
the Metropolitan Commission, including, but not limited to, time and materials; [or] AND
(H) An emergency suspension.
(3) The Metropolitan Commission may seek the following judicial
enforcement remedies:
(A) Petitioning the District Court of St. Mary’s County for injunctive
relief;
(B) For a conviction of a violation, requesting civil penalties up to one
thousand dollars ($1,000.00) per violation, per day; or
(C) For a conviction of a violation, requesting criminal penalties of
not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00) per violation, or imprisonment for not more
than one (1) year per violation, or both.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, April 28, 2026.
– 5 –